Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 8. ACQUISITION, SALE, OR LEASE OF PROPERTY

SUBTITLE B. COUNTY ACQUISITION, SALE, OR LEASE OF PROPERTY

CHAPTER 270. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS AFFECTING THE ACQUISITION, SALE, OR LEASE OF PROPERTY BY COUNTIES

Sec. 270.001. ACQUISITION OF REAL PROPERTY BY CONVEYANCE. A deed, grant, or conveyance that is made, is acknowledged or proven, and is recorded as other deeds of conveyance to a county, to the courts or commissioners of a county, or to another person for the use and benefit of a county vests in the county the right, title, interest, and estate that the grantor had in the property at the time the instrument was executed and that the grantor intended to convey.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 270.002. PURCHASE AND SALE OF PROPERTY AFTER JUDGMENT. If property is sold under execution or order of sale on a judgment in favor of a county, including execution on a judgment in a case of scire facias in the name of the state, the attorney or agent representing the county, with the advice and consent of the commissioners court, may purchase and dispose of the property for the county in the same manner as an attorney or agent for the state under Article 4401, Revised Statutes. The officer selling the property shall execute and deliver to the county a deed to the property. On sale of the property by the county, the commissioners court, in the name of the county, shall execute and deliver to the purchaser a deed to the property.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 270.003. ACQUISITION AND USE OF PUBLIC PLATFORM TONNAGE SCALES. (a) The commissioners court of a county may, on the presentation of a suitable written petition signed by 500 or more inhabitants of the county, purchase and install one or more public platform tonnage scales suitable and adapted for the weighing of livestock, produce, agricultural products, or other goods to facilitate the development of truck farming, cattle raising, or other trade or business in which the availability of a public scale is necessary or desirable.

(b) The commissioners court may operate a public scale. It may provide adequate personnel for this purpose or it may lease or rent, under terms and conditions it may set, the scale to a responsible private person.

(c) The commissioners court may prescribe rules concerning the use of a public scale, including the fee to be charged.

(d) A public scale provided for under this section must at all times be available for use by the public.

(e) The money that may be collected or received from the use or operation of a public scale or through a contract executed under this section shall be deposited in the general fund of the county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 270.004. AUTHORITY TO CONTRACT WITH FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR ACQUISITION OF LAND OR HOUSING. (a) The commissioners court of a county may:

(1) contract with the United States, including the General Services Administrator and the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development and their successors, for:

(A) the acquisition of land or an interest in land located in the county that is owned by the United States; or

(B) the acquisition of temporary housing on land that the United States owns or controls;

(2) acquire from the United States, by purchase, gift, or otherwise, land or housing described in Subdivision (1); and

(3) own and operate land or housing acquired under this subsection.

(b) The commissioners court may:

(1) adopt a resolution or order requesting the United States to transfer to the county the land, housing, or the interest in the land or housing that the United States is authorized to convey or transfer to the county; and

(2) bind the county to comply with all terms and conditions imposed by the United States as a prerequisite to the transfer or conveyance of the land, housing, or the interest in the land or housing.

(c) The instrument or deed conveying to the county the land, housing, or the interest in the land or housing may contain conditions, provisions, covenants, or warranties prescribed by the United States and agreed on by the commissioners court acting for the county, provided the terms are not prohibited by the Texas Constitution.

(d) The commissioners court may issue negotiable bonds and levy taxes for the interest and sinking funds of the bonds, in accordance with Subtitles A and C, Title 9, Government Code, to purchase or acquire in another manner the land or housing and to improve, enlarge, extend, or repair the land or housing.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.292, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 270.005. CONTRACTS WITH FEDERAL GOVERNMENT FOR CONSTRUCTION IN POPULOUS COUNTY. (a) The commissioners court of a county with a population of 251,000 to 260,000 may contract with the United States government or a federal agency for:

(1) the joint construction or improvement of roads, bridges, or other county improvements; or

(2) the maintenance of a project constructed under this section.

(b) The county may pay for its part of the expense of a project constructed under this section from available county funds.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 95, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 669, Sec. 80, 81, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1163 (H.B. 2702), Sec. 86, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 157, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 270.006. REPORT ABOUT USE OF, OR ACCIDENT INVOLVING, EQUIPMENT IN COUNTY WITH POPULATION OF 500,000 OR MORE. (a) In this section, "equipment" means equipment purchased with and operated with public funds or personal equipment for which an employee or officer is reimbursed by a county or flood control district for operation and maintenance charges.

(b) This section applies only to a county with a population of 500,000 or more.

(c) An officer or employee of a county, a district officer, or an employee of a flood control district in the county who operates equipment shall file with each payroll a report for each piece of equipment in the charge of the employee or officer, showing:

(1) the daily use of the equipment;

(2) the time and mileage run;

(3) the amount spent for repairs;

(4) the gasoline, oil, and grease purchased; and

(5) the road, bridge, or project on which work was performed.

(d) The report must be in writing and must be signed and certified by the officer or employee actually using the equipment.

(e) An officer or employee of the county, a district officer, or an employee of a flood control district in the county shall file a report of an accident involving equipment in the charge of the employee or officer. The report must give the cause, damage, location, circumstances, and persons and equipment involved in the accident.

(f) A report under this section must be on a prescribed form and must be filed on or before the fifth day of the month succeeding the period of operation.

(g) A report under this section must disclose all facts essential to a proper analysis of maintenance and operating costs and other statistical purposes.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 270.007. SALE OF COMPUTER SOFTWARE. (a) A county may sell or license a computer software application or software system developed by the county for use by the county. A county may sell or license a computer software application or software system developed for the county by a person under contract unless the contract specifically prohibits the county from selling or licensing the application or system.

(b) A county may exclusively contract with a person to market the application or system. If the original contract for development of the application or system under Subsection (a) does not include a provision for marketing the application or system, a contract under this subsection shall be awarded in compliance with Section 262.030, concerning the alternative competitive procedure for insurance or high technology items.

(c) The provisions of the open records law, Chapter 552, Government Code, governing the cost of making copies of public records do not apply to a software application or software system subject to this section.

(d) In this section, "computer software application or software system" includes documentation of the application or system, and does not include any hardware or equipment associated with the application or system.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the provisions of this section apply only to (1) the sale or licensure of a software application or software system by a county or (2) a request under Chapter 552, Government Code, for a computer software application or software system itself, and do not apply to the cost of production for public inspection or copying of information collected, assembled, or maintained through the use of such software, including on-line instructions on computer searches or information necessary to obtain records from county computer systems, which cost shall be governed by Subchapter F, Chapter 552, Government Code, without regard to the cost of developing the software. Nothing in this section shall preclude header or record information, necessary for conversion and interpretation of electronic images, being made available for electronic images of public records.

(f) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a county may sell or license software under this section for a price negotiated between the county and the purchaser or licensee, including another governmental entity.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 301, Sec. 12.

(h) The provisions of this section shall not authorize the development by a county of any software application or software system not otherwise authorized by law.

(i) A county may not develop a computer application or software system for the sole purpose of selling, licensing, or marketing the software application or software system.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 758, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 301, Sec. 10, 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1341 (S.B. 1233), Sec. 19, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 270.008. DISPOSAL OF SUPER COLLIDER PROPERTY. (a) If the United States Department of Energy returns or gives to any county any property that was used or was to be used in connection with or by a superconducting super collider high-energy research facility, the county may sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of the property by a method determined by the commissioners court of the county.

(b) A commissioners court disposing of property under this section is not required to comply with any provision of this title, including Sections 263.001 and 272.001, requiring a public auction or bidding process for the disposal of property.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 92, Sec. 1, eff. May 15, 1997.

Sec. 270.009. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY OF COUNTY. A county may acquire, apply for, register, secure, hold, protect, and renew under the laws of this state, another state, the United States, or any other nation:

(1) a patent for the invention or discovery of:

(A) any new and useful process, machine, manufacture, composition of matter, art, or method;

(B) any new use of a known process, machine, manufacture, composition of matter, art, or method; or

(C) any new and useful improvement on a known process, machine, manufacture, composition of matter, art, or method;

(2) a copyright of an original work of authorship fixed in any tangible medium of expression, now known or later developed, from which the work may be perceived, reproduced, or otherwise communicated, either directly or with the aid of a machine or device;

(3) a trademark, service mark, collective mark, or certification mark for a word, name, symbol, device, or slogan that the county uses to identify and distinguish the county's goods and services from other goods and services; and

(4) other evidence of protection of exclusivity issued for intellectual property.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 301, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.